test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-INTR-PFV-yi_y-itsiy_cry.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Verb - itsiy[cry] :
    itsiy[cry]+V+I+Pfv+SbjSg1:       yistsày
    itsiy[cry]+V+I+Pfv+SbjSg2:       yítsày
    itsiy[cry]+V+I+Pfv+SbjSg3:       yítsày
    itsiy[cry]+V+I+Pfv+SbjPl1:       [yiìtsày, yaàtsày]
    itsiy[cry]+V+I+Pfv+SbjPl1+Distr: [dàyiìtsày, dàyaàtsày]
    itsiy[cry]+V+I+Pfv+SbjPl2:       yastsày
    itsiy[cry]+V+I+Pfv+SbjPl2+Distr: dàyastsày
    itsiy[cry]+V+I+Pfv+SbjPl3:       giyítsày
    itsiy[cry]+V+I+Pfv+SbjPl3+Distr: dàgiyítsày
    itsiy[cry]+V+I+Pfv+SbjSg4:       ts'iyítsày
    itsiy[cry]+V+I+Pfv+SbjSg4+Distr: dàts'iyítsày
